Utah statutes.
59-2-1354.   Notice of intention to foreclose -- Service of notice.
Before the commencement of any action, 30 days' written notice of intention to
do so shall be given to the owner, if known, by enclosing the notice in an
envelope plainly addressed to the owner at the owner's post office address, as
shown on the last assessment roll of the county in which the real estate is
located, postage prepaid.  If the post office address of any owner does not
appear on the assessment roll, notice shall be addressed to the owner at the
general delivery at the post office in the city, town, or precinct where the
real estate is located, postage prepaid.  Service of the notice is complete
when deposited in the United States mail.
